lb_LU.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY erntsialohcugmpdkfézbwäëvSKBPGAMFDHRyEVxTWLIjONCZüqUJËèÄöQ-ÉêôçîÖûâXYñÜàï'

KEY qwertyuiopüè|asdfghjklöéäà|zxcvbnm

BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK '

FLAG long

NOSPLITSUGS
NOSUGGEST !0

REP 79
REP a er
REP a ar
REP ab of
REP ae ä
REP ai äi
REP ai ä
REP al e
REP allzelaang allze_laang
REP amgaang am_Gaang
REP amt büro
REP annuecht an_Uecht
REP ansech u_sech
REP Betäub Déid
REP betäube déide
REP betäubs déits
REP betäubt déit
REP bisewell bis_ewell
REP biswell bis_ewell
REP ch sch
REP ch j
REP deeër där
REP ech ësch
REP eh ee
REP ehrzah éizue
REP ei äi
REP eig äip
REP emüteg amiddeg
REP engkéier eng_Kéier
REP ère är
REP ex ächs
REP f ph
REP finsternis däischtert
REP gaang gaangen
REP get gëtt
REP iff éif
REP inhorn enhar
REP inzah enzue
REP io jo
REP kin kéin
REP l ll
REP l hl
REP lë lle
REP man maachen
REP mee mä
REP mëss méchs
REP nëtzlos onnëtz
REP nie ni
REP oft dacks
REP olkenkratzer ollekekrazert
REP onct unkt
REP oots éits
REP ph f
REP roh ree
REP rohe reeë
REP roof erof
REP s sch
REP säitdeem zënterhier
REP säitdeem zënter_datt
REP soulues esou_lues
REP stäub stëbs
REP stotteren tuddelen
REP Tankstell Bensinsstatioun
REP tapf dap
REP të tte
REP Treibhaus Zär
REP Treibhause Zärene
REP Treibhausg Zäreg
REP Urheber Auteurs
REP urheber auteurs
REP Urheber Auteur
REP üst ëscht
REP ut id
REP Virunallem Virun_allem
REP virunallem virun_allem
REP wanns wann_s
REP wéieng wéi_eng
REP wéivill wéi_vill
REP z ds
REP zevill ze_vill

MAP 17
MAP äa(aa)àÄA(Aa)
MAP bB
MAP ck(ck)CK
MAP dt(tt)(dd)DT
MAP e(ee)äëêéèEÄËÊÉÈ
MAP fvwFVW
MAP gj(ch)GJ
MAP hH
MAP i(ii)I
MAP lL
MAP n(nn)N
MAP o(oo)öôOÖ
MAP pP
MAP qQ
MAP r(er)(rr)R(Er)
MAP s(ss)S
MAP u(uu)üûUÜÛ

SFX A0 Y 4
SFX A0 0 st/a0 [^rs] is:superlative
SFX A0 0 t/a0 s is:superlative
SFX A0 0 st/a0 [^äu]r is:superlative
SFX A0 r erst/a0 [äu]r is:superlative

SFX a0 N 9
SFX a0 0 em . is:em
SFX a0 0 en . is:en
SFX a0 0 e . is:en is:eifeler
SFX a0 0 er . is:er
SFX a0 n 0 [^rny]n is:eifeler
SFX a0 nn 0 [^oëa]nn is:eifeler
SFX a0 0 t [^drt] is:t
SFX a0 0 t [^äu]r is:t
SFX a0 r ert [äu]r is:t

SFX a1 Y 31
SFX a1 0 em . is:em
SFX a1 0 en . is:en
SFX a1 0 e . is:en is:eifeler
SFX a1 0 er . is:er
SFX a1 f aft af is:t
SFX a1 g agt ag is:t
SFX a1 l alt al is:t
SFX a1 m amt am is:t
SFX a1 n ant an is:t
SFX a1 r art ar is:t
SFX a1 v avt av is:t
SFX a1 n änt än is:t
SFX a1 m emt em is:t
SFX a1 n ent en is:t
SFX a1 f ift if is:t
SFX a1 m imt im is:t
SFX a1 n int in is:t
SFX a1 s ist is is:t
SFX a1 v ivt iv is:t
SFX a1 b obt ob is:t
SFX a1 f oft of is:t
SFX a1 g ogt og is:t
SFX a1 m omt om is:t
SFX a1 n ont on is:t
SFX a1 n önt ön is:t
SFX a1 s ost os is:t
SFX a1 s öst ös is:t
SFX a1 l ult ul is:t
SFX a1 n unt un is:t
SFX a1 s ust us is:t
SFX a1 p opt op is:t

SFX A1 Y 37
SFX A1 0 ast/a0 a is:superlative
SFX A1 d adst/a0 ad is:superlative
SFX A1 f afst/a0 af is:superlative
SFX A1 g agst/a0 ag is:superlative
SFX A1 l alst/a0 al is:superlative
SFX A1 m amst/a0 am is:superlative
SFX A1 n anst/a0 an is:superlative
SFX A1 r arst/a0 ar is:superlative
SFX A1 t atst/a0 at is:superlative
SFX A1 v avst/a0 av is:superlative
SFX A1 n änst/a0 än is:superlative
SFX A1 m emst/a0 em is:superlative
SFX A1 n enst/a0 en is:superlative
SFX A1 d idst/a0 id is:superlative
SFX A1 f ifst/a0 if is:superlative
SFX A1 m imst/a0 im is:superlative
SFX A1 n inst/a0 in is:superlative
SFX A1 s ist/a0 is is:superlative
SFX A1 v ivst/a0 iv is:superlative
SFX A1 0 ost/a0 o is:superlative
SFX A1 b obst/a0 ob is:superlative
SFX A1 d odst/a0 od is:superlative
SFX A1 d ödst/a0 öd is:superlative
SFX A1 f ofst/a0 of is:superlative
SFX A1 g ogst/a0 og is:superlative
SFX A1 n onst/a0 on is:superlative
SFX A1 n önst/a0 ön is:superlative
SFX A1 m omst/a0 om is:superlative
SFX A1 s ost/a0 os is:superlative
SFX A1 s öst/a0 ös is:superlative
SFX A1 t otst/a0 ot is:superlative
SFX A1 0 öst/a0 ö is:superlative
SFX A1 0 ust/a0 u is:superlative
SFX A1 d üdst/a0 üd is:superlative
SFX A1 s ust/a0 us is:superlative
SFX A1 t utst/a0 ut is:superlative
SFX A1 n unst/a0 un is:superlative

SFX a2 Y 37
SFX a2 0 ke c is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 ken c is:en
SFX a2 0 kem c is:em
SFX a2 0 ker c is:er
SFX a2 0 le l is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 len l is:en
SFX a2 0 lem l is:em
SFX a2 0 ler l is:er
SFX a2 0 me m is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 men m is:en
SFX a2 0 mem m is:em
SFX a2 0 mer m is:er
SFX a2 0 se s is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 sen s is:en
SFX a2 0 sem s is:em
SFX a2 0 ser s is:er
SFX a2 0 te t is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 ten t is:en
SFX a2 0 tem t is:em
SFX a2 0 ter t is:er
SFX a2 0 t [^t] is:t
SFX a2 e len le is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 e lem le is:em
SFX a2 e ler le is:er
SFX a2 e le le is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 pen p is:en
SFX a2 0 pe p is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 pem p is:em
SFX a2 0 per p is:er
SFX a2 k cken k is:en
SFX a2 k cke k is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 k cker k is:er
SFX a2 k ckem k is:em
SFX a2 e men me is:en
SFX a2 e me me is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 e mer me is:er
SFX a2 e mem me is:em

SFX j0 Y 39
SFX j0 ef we ef is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 ef wen ef is:en
SFX j0 ef wem ef is:em
SFX j0 ef wer ef is:er
SFX j0 f we [^e]f is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 f wen [^e]f is:en
SFX j0 f wem [^e]f is:em
SFX j0 f wer [^e]f is:er
SFX j0 t de [^t]t is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 t den [^t]t is:en
SFX j0 t dem [^t]t is:em
SFX j0 t der [^t]t is:er
SFX j0 tt dde tt is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 tt dden tt is:en
SFX j0 tt ddem tt is:em
SFX j0 tt dder tt is:er
SFX j0 ch je ch is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 ch jen ch is:en
SFX j0 ch jem ch is:em
SFX j0 ch jer ch is:er
SFX j0 er re er is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 er ren er is:en
SFX j0 er rem er is:em
SFX j0 er rer er is:er
SFX j0 dd tte dd is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 dd tten dd is:en
SFX j0 dd ttem dd is:em
SFX j0 dd tter dd is:er
SFX j0 0 t [^tdi] is:t
SFX j0 0 ssen i is:en
SFX j0 0 sser i is:er
SFX j0 0 sse i is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 0 ssem i is:em
SFX j0 0 st i is:t
SFX j0 d nen nd is:en
SFX j0 d ne nd is:en is:eifeler
SFX j0 d nem nd is:em
SFX j0 d ner nd is:er
SFX j0 0 s i is:s

SFX J0 Y 11
SFX J0 aach ächst/a0 aach is:superlative
SFX J0 aark äerkst/a0 aark is:superlative
SFX J0 aarf äerfst/a0 aarf is:superlative
SFX J0 aart äertst/a0 aart is:superlative
SFX J0 al eelst/a0 al is:superlative
SFX J0 ank änkst/a0 ank is:superlative
SFX J0 ich chst/a0 ch is:superlative
SFX J0 dd ttst/a0 dd is:superlative
SFX J0 ouss éisst/a0 ouss is:superlative
SFX J0 aarm äermst/a0 aarm is:superlative
SFX J0 uerz ierzt/a0 uerz is:superlative

SFX l0 N 9
SFX l0 0 n [^e]e is:en
SFX l0 0 r [^e]e is:er
SFX l0 0 m [^e]e is:em
SFX l0 0 t . is:t
SFX l0 e ë [^e]e is:en is:eifeler
SFX l0 0 ë ee is:en is:eifeler
SFX l0 0 ëm ee is:em
SFX l0 0 ën ee is:en
SFX l0 0 ër ee is:er

SFX n0 Y 3
SFX n0 0 en . is:plural
SFX n0 0 e [^é] is:plural is:eifeler
SFX n0 0 ë é is:plural is:eifeler

SFX N0 Y 2
SFX N0 e ë . is:plural is:eifeler
SFX N0 0 n . is:plural
