lb_LU.dic
akommesschwaach/a0J0 po:adjective
Annexe/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
argumentativ/a1 po:adjective
asazfäeg/A0a0 po:adjective
attraktiv/a1A1 po:adjective
ausseruerdentlech/A0a0 po:adjective
Autoschrottdeponie/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Autostelefon/n0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
batteraarm/a0J0 po:adjective
benevole/a2 po:adjective
bewaacht/a0 po:adjective
biparental/a2 po:adjective
Blague/N0 po:noun
bléid/A0a0 po:adjective
boer/j0 po:adjective
breet/A0j0 po:adjective
Bridderli/n0 po:noun
budgetsneutral/a1A1 po:adjective
Cercle/N0 po:noun
Connaissance/N0 po:noun
consultativ/a1A1 po:adjective
däischterbeige/l0 po:adjective
däischterorange/l0 po:adjective
däischterrout/j0 po:adjective
dediéiert/A0a0 po:adjective
deguelasse/A0l0 po:adjective
Depanneuse/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Devastatioun/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
devotional/a1A1 po:adjective
diachron/a1 po:adjective
distinguéiert/A0a0 po:adjective
donkelrout/j0 po:adjective
douce/A0l0 po:adjective
driibseg/A0a0 po:adjective
Ecrevisse/N0 po:noun
efficace/A0l0 po:adjective
emotional/a1A1 po:adjective
ënnerschiddlech/A0a0 po:adjective
epidemiologesch/a0 po:adjective
Equilibrage/N0 po:noun
Erënnerunsplaz/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
evangelikal/a1 po:adjective
explizit/A0a2 po:adjective
exterminéiert/A0a0 po:adjective
extrem/a1A1 po:adjective
feierrout/j0 po:adjective
fertil/A0a2 po:adjective
fervent/A0a0 po:adjective
fettaarm/a0J0 po:adjective
flatschdeg/A0a0 po:adjective
formal/a1A1 po:adjective
fossil/a2 po:adjective
Fragmentatioun/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
frontal/a1A1 po:adjective
Fuerschungsministère/N0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
gedehnt/A0a0 po:adjective
gefillskal/a1J0 po:adjective
gefrääst/a0 po:adjective
genee/A0l0 po:adjective
gepuddelt/a0 po:adjective
giedlech/a0 po:adjective
gläichstaark/a0J0 po:adjective
Granat/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Grandeure/N0 po:noun
gratis/a2 po:adjective
gravéierend/A0a0 po:adjective
grouss/a0J0 po:adjective
gutt/j0 po:adjective
haart/j0J0 po:adjective
habil/A0a2 po:adjective
häerzensgutt/j0 po:adjective
haushéich/j0 po:adjective
héich/j0J0 po:adjective
héichintensiv/a1A1 po:adjective
hellbeige/l0 po:adjective
hellorange/l0 po:adjective
hellrout/j0 po:adjective
hexadezimal/a1 po:adjective
hoergenee/A0l0 po:adjective
Homicide/N0 po:noun
illegitim/A0a2 po:adjective
Immigratiounsminister/n0F0F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
implizit/A0a2 po:adjective
inklusiv/a1A1 po:adjective
institutionell/A0a0 po:adjective
instrumentaliséiert/a0 po:adjective
integral/a1A1 po:adjective
iwwerdimensional/a1A1 po:adjective
juxtarenal/a1 po:adjective
kal/a1J0 po:adjective
kardinolrout/j0 po:adjective
Kastratioun/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
kloer/A0j0 po:adjective
knallrout/j0 po:adjective
kommunikativ/a1A1 po:adjective
kompenséiert/A0a0 po:adjective
konkretiséiert/a0 po:adjective
Konspiratiounstheorie/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
kontraintuitiv/a1 po:adjective
krank/a0J0 po:adjective
kruzial/a1A1 po:adjective
Kuelewaggon/n0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
labil/A0a2 po:adjective
large/A0l0 po:adjective
léif/A0j0 po:adjective
louche/A0l0 po:adjective
marginal/a1A1 po:adjective
matriarchalesch/A0a0 po:adjective
Mëllechfong/n0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
mënscheveruechtend/A0a0 po:adjective
Militärakademie/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
millimetergenee/l0 po:adjective
minim/a2 po:adjective
mofrout/j0 po:adjective
monoparental/a2 po:adjective
morbid/a0A1 po:adjective
moros/a1 po:adjective
Nuklearwaff/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
ofgestempelt/a0 po:adjective
onattraktiv/a1A1 po:adjective
onbequem/a1A1 po:adjective
onbewunnt/A0a0 po:adjective
ongenee/A0l0 po:adjective
onstabil/A0a2 po:adjective
orange/A0l0 po:adjective
pafeg/A0a0 po:adjective
parallel/a2 po:adjective
Parömie/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
patrulléiert/A0a0 po:adjective
pejorativ/a1A1 po:adjective
Plackett/n0 po:noun
primitiv/a1A1 po:adjective
primordial/a1A1 po:adjective
Proprietaire/N0F5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
purpurrout/j0 po:adjective
ranghéich/j0J0 po:adjective
razekal/a1J0 po:adjective
recycléiert/a0 po:adjective
reell/A0a0 po:adjective
Reformpropos/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
regulativ/a1A1 po:adjective
restriktiv/a1A1 po:adjective
rubinrout/j0 po:adjective
saukal/a1J0 po:adjective
Schnéiklatzschluecht/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Schoulkolonie/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
schwaach/a0J0 po:adjective
schwéngzeg/A0a0 po:adjective
schwiefelaarm/a0J0 po:adjective
sedativ/a1 po:adjective
senil/A0a2 po:adjective
sizilianesch/a0 po:adjective
Sportswett/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
steenhaart/j0 po:adjective
stereotyp/a2 po:adjective
subversiv/a1A1 po:adjective
Surprise/N0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
tacite/l0 po:adjective
telegen/a1A1 po:adjective
Terrassemiwwel/n0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
touristesch/A0a0 po:adjective
turquoise/l0 po:adjective
ugekënnegt/A0a0 po:adjective
ultime/a2 po:adjective
ural/a1J0 po:adjective
verbal/a1A1 po:adjective
Verkéiersministère/N0 po:noun ts:masculine__
verstallt/A0a0 po:adjective
veruechtenswäert/A0a0 po:adjective
viril/A0a2 po:adjective
volontaire/l0 po:adjective
wäirout/j0 po:adjective
Wuerzel/n0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
zimlech/a0 po:adjective
zolidd/j0J0 po:adjective
